Tennessee, session 114, SB1510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (15).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-253(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Committee for providing competitive integrated employment for individuals
with severe disabilities, created by § 71-4-703;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1510
010067
- 1 -